Massachusetts, session 194th, H340.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 105A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition, “Abandoned lease space” and 
inserting in place thereof the following definition:- 
“Abandoned leased space”, (i) a leased space that the operator finds unlocked and empty 
or unlocked and containing personal property with a value less than $300, in the operator's 
opinion, (ii) a leased space, which possession, all rights to and any personal property within has 
been affirmatively surrendered to the operator by the occupant; or (iii) a leased space containing 
personal property upon the end of the rental agreement. 

of 2 9  SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 105A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by inserting at the end of the definition of “Rental agreement”, the 
following new sentence:- A rental agreement may be delivered and accepted electronically. 
SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 105A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the first sentence the following new sentence:- The occupant shall be 
bound by the rental agreement, even if unsigned, if the occupant uses the leased space more than 
30 days after delivery of the written notice of the rental agreement to the occupant.